Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.120

Pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program.

(1) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to support paraeducators who wish to become teachers by providing financial aid for the completion of an associate of arts degree.

(2) To qualify for the program an applicant must:

(a) Not have earned a college degree;

(b) Provide documentation:

(i) From his or her school district or building of one year of successful student interaction and leadership as a classified instructional employee; or

(ii) Of his or her completion of two years of a recruiting Washington teachers program, established under RCW 28A.415.370;

(c) Intend to pursue an initial teacher certificate with an endorsement in a shortage area via a Washington professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program; and

(d) Be accepted into, and maintain enrollment for no more than the equivalent of four full-time academic years at, a community and technical college under RCW 28B.50.020.

(3) Participants are eligible to receive a pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship for up to four academic years.

(4) The office must prioritize applicants in the following order:

(a) Applicants recruited and supported by their school districts to become teachers;

(b) Applicants who completed two years of a recruiting Washington teachers program, established under RCW 28A.415.370; and

(c) Applicants intending to complete an associate of arts degree in two academic years or less.

[ 2019 c 295 s 218; 2017 c 237 s 19; 2007 c 396 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.660.042.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.